Massachusetts, session 194th, H1083.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 167E of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after section 16 the
following new section:—Section 17. Banks and lending institutions shall issue monthly
statements to their mortgage loan customers which includes, but is not limited to, the following
information: the balance of principal remaining to be paid; a confirmation of the most recent
payment received; and the balance of any escrow accounts and a description of any payments
from such escrow accounts.
of 1